Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 13
Arkansas Conservation Corps Act

11-13-101 — 11-13-113. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This chapter was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1151, § 3. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

11-13-101. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 1.

11-13-102. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 2; 1997, No. 540, § 15; 1999, No. 646, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 119.

11-13-103. Acts 1993, No. 1232, §§ 3, 15.

11-13-104. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 4.

11-13-105. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 5.

11-13-106. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 7.

11-13-107. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 8.

11-13-108. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 9.

11-13-109. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 10.

11-13-110. Acts 1993, No. 1232, §§ 6, 11.

11-13-111. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 13.

11-13-112. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 14.

11-13-113. Acts 1993, No. 1232, § 12.